Nevada, session 83, SB363.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 41.03475 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
41.03475 [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 41.745, no] A
judgment may not be entered against the State of Nevada or any
agency of the State or against any political subdivision of the State
for any act or omission of any present or former officer, employee,
immune contractor, member of a board or commission or State
Legislator which was outside the course and scope of the person’s
public duties or employment.
Sec. 2. NRS 41.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.130 [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 41.745,]
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever any person
shall suffer personal injury by wrongful act, neglect or default of
another, only the person causing the injury is liable to the person
injured for [damages; and where the person causing the injury is
employed by another person or corporation responsible for the
conduct of the person causing the injury, that other person or
corporation so responsible is liable to the person injured for]
damages.
Sec. 3. NRS 41.141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.141 1. In any action to recover damages for death or
injury to persons or for injury to property , [in which comparative
negligence is asserted as a defense,] the comparative negligence of
the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s decedent does not bar a recovery if that
negligence was not greater than the negligence or gross negligence
of the parties to the action against whom recovery is sought.
2. In those cases, the judge shall instruct the jury that:
(a) The plaintiff may not recover if the plaintiff’s comparative
negligence or that of the plaintiff’s decedent is greater than the
negligence of the [defendant] tortfeasor or the combined negligence
of multiple [defendants.] tortfeasors.
(b) If the jury determines the plaintiff is entitled to recover, it
shall return:
(1) By general verdict the total amount of damages the
plaintiff would be entitled to recover without regard to the plaintiff’s
comparative negligence; and
(2) A special verdict indicating the percentage of negligence
attributable to each [party remaining in the action.] tortfeasor.
3. If a defendant in such an action settles with the plaintiff
before the entry of judgment, the [comparative negligence of that
defendant and the amount of the settlement must not thereafter be
admitted into evidence nor considered by the jury. The] judge shall
-
*SB363*

– 4 –
deduct the amount of the settlement from the net sum otherwise
recoverable by the plaintiff pursuant to the general and special
verdicts.
4. In assessing percentages of fault, the trier of fact shall
consider the fault of all persons who contributed to the death of,
or injury to, a person or injury to property, regardless of whether:
(a) The person was, or could have been, named a party to the
suit; and
(b) Liability is based upon strict liability or negligence.
5. The trier of fact may consider the negligence, strict liability
or fault of any nonparty if the plaintiff entered into a settlement
agreement with the nonparty or if the defending party gives notice
before trial, in accordance with any requirements established by
court rule, that a nonparty was wholly or partially at fault.
6. An assessment of percentage of fault for nonparties:
(a) May only be used for accurately determining the fault of
the named parties;
(b) Does not subject any nonparty to liability in the action
where the assessment is made; and
(c) May not be introduced as evidence of liability in any other
action.
7. Where recovery is allowed against more than one defendant
in such an action , [, except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,]
each defendant is severally liable to the plaintiff only for that
portion of the judgment which represents the percentage of
negligence attributable to that defendant.
[5. This section does not affect the joint and several liability, if
any, of the defendants in an action based upon:
(a) Strict liability;
(b) An intentional tort;
(c) The emission, disposal or spillage of a toxic or hazardous
substance;
(d) The concerted acts of the defendants; or
(e) An injury to any person or property resulting from a product
which is manufactured, distributed, sold or used in this State.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Concerted acts of the defendants” does not include
negligent acts committed by providers of health care while working
together to provide treatment to a patient.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 4. Chapter 42 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 42.021, in any civil action
for personal injury caused by wrongful act, neglect or default of
-
*SB363*

– 5 –
another, damages for medical expenses may only be awarded by
the trier of fact as follows:
1. Damages for past medical expenses that have been paid
must not exceed the amount paid, regardless of the source of
payment.
2. Damages for past medical expenses that are unpaid must
not exceed:
(a) If the plaintiff has health insurance:
(1) The amount that the health insurance is obligated to
pay to satisfy the charges for the medical treatment; and
(2) The share of medical expenses that the plaintiff is
required to pay under the health insurance policy.
(b) If the plaintiff has health insurance but obtains medical
treatment on a lien basis or otherwise does not submit any charges
for medical treatment to the insurance company:
(1) Evidence of the amount that the health insurance would
have paid under the health insurance policy to satisfy the past
unpaid charges for medical treatment; and
(2) The share of medical expenses that the plaintiff would
have been entitled to under the health insurance policy.
(c) If the plaintiff does not have health insurance or has
coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, not more than 120
percent of:
(1) The Medicare reimbursement rate in effect on the date
of the medical treatment received by the plaintiff; or
(2) The applicable Medicaid reimbursement rate in effect
on the date of the medical treatment received by the plaintiff, if
there is not an applicable Medicare reimbursement rate for the
treatment.
3. Damages for any future medical expenses that the plaintiff
will incur must not exceed, if at the time of trial the plaintiff:
(a) Has health insurance or is eligible for health insurance:
(1) The amount for which the future medical expenses
could be satisfied if submitted to the health insurance; and
(2) The share of medical expenses under the health
insurance policy that the plaintiff would be entitled.
(b) Does not have health insurance or is insured through or
eligible for Medicare or Medicaid, not more than 120 percent of:
(1) The Medicare reimbursement rate in effect at the time
of trial for the future medical treatment the plaintiff; or
(2) The applicable Medicaid reimbursement rate in effect at
the time of trial for the future medical treatment of the plaintiff, if
there is not an applicable Medicare reimbursement rate pursuant
to subparagraph (1).
-
*SB363*

– 6 –
Sec. 5. NRS 616C.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.380 1. If a hearing officer, appeals officer or district
court renders a decision on a claim for compensation and the insurer
or employer appeals that decision, but is unable to obtain a stay of
the decision:
(a) Payment of that portion of an award for a permanent partial
disability which is contested must be made in installment payments
until the claim reaches final resolution.
(b) Payment of the award must be made in monthly installments
of 66 2/3 percent of the average wage of the claimant until the claim
reaches final resolution if the claim is for more than 3 months of
past benefits for a temporary total disability or rehabilitation, or for
a payment in lump sum related to past benefits for rehabilitation,
such as costs for purchasing a business or equipment.
2. If the final resolution of the claim is in favor of the claimant,
the remaining amount of compensation to which the claimant is
entitled may be paid in a lump sum to the claimant if the claimant is
otherwise eligible for such a payment pursuant to NRS 616C.495
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto. A private attorney or
representative of the claimant may not receive a fee for any
services provided in an amount greater than 20 percent of any
lump sum payment paid to the claimant pursuant to this section. If
the final resolution of the claim is in favor of the insurer or
employer, any amount paid to the claimant in excess of the
uncontested amount must be deducted from any future benefits
related to that claim, other than medical benefits, to which the
claimant is entitled. The deductions must be made in a reasonable
manner so as not to create an undue hardship to the claimant.
Sec. 6. NRS 616C.427 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.427 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3
of NRS 616C.315 and except as otherwise provided in this section,
if an injured employee is receiving compensation based on a
calculation of the average monthly wage of the injured employee as
determined pursuant to the regulations adopted by the Administrator
pursuant to NRS 616C.420, the injured employee or the employer
may request a hearing before a hearing officer pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 616C.315 to 616C.385, inclusive, asking for a
recalculation of the average monthly wage of the injured employee.
2. The injured employee is entitled to have his or her average
monthly wage recalculated if the injured employee proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that the insurer calculated the
average monthly wage improperly or incorrectly as a result of:
(a) The use of any improper or incorrect information or
methodology;
-
*SB363*

– 7 –
(b) The failure to use any proper or correct information or
methodology;
(c) Any error of law or fact; or
(d) Any other error, omission, neglect or wrongful act.
3. If the injured employee proves that the insurer calculated his
or her average monthly wage improperly or incorrectly, resulting in
an underpayment of compensation:
(a) The insurer shall:
(1) Increase the injured employee’s future compensation
based on the correct average monthly wage; and
(2) Pay the injured employee a lump sum in an amount equal
to the underpayment of compensation for the period during which
the insurer was using the incorrect average monthly wage; and
(b) The remedy provided in paragraph (a) is the sole remedy for
the underpayment and the insurer is not subject to the imposition of
any fine or benefit penalty therefor.
4. A private attorney or representative of the injured
employee may not receive a fee for any services provided in an
amount greater than 20 percent of any lump sum payment paid to
the injured employee pursuant to this section.
5. If the hearing officer determines that the calculation of the
average monthly wage resulted in an overpayment of compensation,
the insurer may require the injured employee to repay to the insurer
an amount equal to the overpayment received by the injured
employee during any one 30-day period.
[5.] 6. The average monthly wage of an injured employee may
not be challenged by the insurer, the employer or the injured
employee after the date on which any portion of an award for
permanent partial disability is paid or the claim closes, whichever
occurs first.
[6.] 7. The provisions of this section do not apply if the issue
of the average monthly wage of the injured employee was
previously adjudicated to a final decision in:
(a) A hearing before a hearing officer or appeals officer pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 616C.315 to 616C.385, inclusive; or
(b) Any proceedings for judicial review.
Sec. 7. NRS 616C.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.495 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.380,
an award for a permanent partial disability may be paid to a
claimant in a lump sum under the following conditions:
(a) A claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, and before
July 1, 1981, who incurs a disability that does not exceed 12 percent
may elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum. A
claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before July 1, 1995,
-
*SB363*

– 8 –
who incurs a disability that does not exceed 30 percent may elect to
receive his or her compensation in a lump sum.
(b) The spouse, or in the absence of a spouse, any dependent
child of a deceased claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, who is
not entitled to compensation in accordance with NRS 616C.505, is
entitled to a lump sum equal to the present value of the deceased
claimant’s undisbursed award for a permanent partial disability.
(c) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before
July 1, 1995, who incurs a disability that exceeds 30 percent may
elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum equal to the
present value of an award for a disability of 30 percent. If the
claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this paragraph,
the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant that portion of
the claimant’s disability in excess of 30 percent.
(d) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1995, and before
January 1, 2016, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 25 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 25 percent may:
(I) Elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum
equal to the present value of an award for a disability of 25 percent.
If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this sub-
subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant
that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 25 percent.
(II) To the extent that the insurer has offered to provide
compensation in a lump sum up to the present value of an award for
disability of 30 percent, elect to receive his or her compensation in a
lump sum up to the present value of an award for a disability of 30
percent. If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the
claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 30
percent.
(e) Any claimant injured on or after January 1, 2016, and before
July 1, 2017, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(f) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 2017, who incurs a
disability that:
-
*SB363*

– 9 –
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of up to 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(g) If the permanent partial disability rating of a claimant
seeking compensation pursuant to this section would, when
combined with any previous permanent partial disability rating of
the claimant that resulted in an award of benefits to the claimant,
result in the claimant having a total permanent partial disability
rating in excess of 100 percent, the claimant’s disability rating upon
which compensation is calculated must be reduced by such
percentage as required to limit the total permanent partial disability
rating of the claimant for all injuries to not more than 100 percent.
2. If the claimant elects to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum pursuant to subsection 1,
all of the claimant’s benefits for compensation terminate. Except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (d), the claimant’s acceptance of
that payment constitutes a final settlement of all factual and legal
issues in the case. By so accepting the claimant waives all of his or
her rights regarding the claim, including the right to appeal from the
closure of the case or the percentage of his or her disability, except:
(a) The right of the claimant to:
(1) Reopen his or her claim in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 616C.390; or
(2) Have his or her claim considered by his or her insurer
pursuant to NRS 616C.392;
(b) Any counseling, training or other rehabilitative services
provided by the insurer;
(c) The right of the claimant to receive a benefit penalty in
accordance with NRS 616D.120; and
(d) The right of the claimant to conclude or resolve any
contested matter which is pending at the time that the claimant
executes his or her election to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum. The provisions of this
paragraph do not apply to:
(1) The scope of the claim;
(2) The claimant’s stable and ratable status; and
(3) The claimant’s average monthly wage.
3. The claimant, when he or she demands payment in a lump
sum pursuant to subsection 2, must be provided with a written
notice which prominently displays a statement describing the effects
-
*SB363*

– 10 –
of accepting payment in a lump sum of an entire permanent partial
disability award, any portion of such an award or any uncontested
portion of such an award, and that the claimant has 20 days after the
mailing or personal delivery of the notice within which to retract or
reaffirm the demand, before payment may be made and the
claimant’s election becomes final.
4. Any lump-sum payment which has been paid on a claim
incurred on or after July 1, 1973, must be supplemented if necessary
to conform to the provisions of this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the total
lump-sum payment for disablement paid to the claimant must not
be less than one-half the product of the average monthly wage
multiplied by the percentage of disability. If the claimant received
compensation in installment payments for his or her permanent
partial disability before electing to receive payment for that
disability in a lump sum, the lump-sum payment must be calculated
for the remaining payment of compensation.
6. The lump sum payable to the claimant must be equal to the
present value of the compensation awarded, less any advance
payment or lump sum previously paid. The present value must be
calculated using monthly payments in the amounts prescribed in
subsection 8 of NRS 616C.490 and actuarial annuity tables adopted
by the Division. The tables must be reviewed annually by a
consulting actuary and must be adjusted accordingly on July 1 of
each year by the Division using:
(a) The most recent unisex “Static Mortality Tables for Defined
Benefit Pension Plans” published by the Internal Revenue Service;
and
(b) The average 30-Year Treasury Constant Maturity Rate for
March of the current year as reported by the Board of Governors of
the Federal Reserve System.
7. To calculate the present value of a lump sum payable to a
claimant, the insurer shall use the actuarial annuity tables adopted
by the Division that are in effect on the date on which the claimant
elects payment in a lump sum.
8. If a claimant would receive more money by electing to
receive compensation in a lump sum than the claimant would if he
or she receives installment payments, the claimant may elect to
receive the lump-sum payment.
9. A private attorney or representative of the claimant may
not receive a fee for any services provided in an amount greater
than 20 percent of any lump sum payment paid to the claimant
pursuant to this section.
-
*SB363*

– 11 –
Sec. 8. NRS 616C.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.580 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
vocational rehabilitation services must not be provided outside of
this State.
2. An injured employee who:
(a) Resides outside of this State, within 50 miles from any
border of this State, on the date of injury; or
(b) Was injured while temporarily employed in this State by an
employer subject to the provisions of chapters 616A to 617,
inclusive, of NRS who can demonstrate that, on the date of injury,
his or her permanent residence was outside of this State,
 may receive vocational rehabilitation services at a location within
50 miles from his or her residence if such services are available at
such a location.
3. An injured employee who:
(a) Is eligible for vocational rehabilitation services pursuant to
NRS 616C.590; and
(b) Resides outside of this State but does not qualify to receive
vocational rehabilitation services outside of this State pursuant to
subsection 2,
 may execute a written agreement with the insurer which provides
for the payment of compensation to the injured employee in a lump
sum in lieu of the provision of vocational rehabilitation services
pursuant to NRS 616C.595. The amount of the lump sum must not
exceed $20,000.
4. A private attorney or representative of an injured employee
may not receive a fee for any services in an amount greater than
20 percent of any lump sum payment paid to the injured employee
pursuant to this section.
5. An injured employee who resides outside of this State but
does not qualify to receive vocational rehabilitation services outside
of this State pursuant to subsection 2 may receive the vocational
rehabilitation services to which the injured employee is entitled
pursuant to NRS 616C.545 to 616C.575, inclusive, and 616C.590 if
the injured employee relocates to:
(a) This State; or
(b) A location within 50 miles from any border of this State,
 at his or her own expense, if such services are available at such a
location.
[5.] 6. An injured employee who resides in this State may
receive vocational rehabilitation services outside of this State at a
location within 50 miles from the residence of the injured employee
if such services are available at such a location. An insurer may not
unreasonably deny a request made by an injured employee pursuant
-
*SB363*

– 12 –
to this subsection to receive vocational rehabilitation services
outside of this State.
[6.] 7. An injured employee may receive vocational
rehabilitation services in any state that borders this State if the
injured employee demonstrates that the services are available in a
more cost-effective manner than are available in this State. Any
vocational rehabilitation services provided pursuant to this
subsection must be monitored by a vocational rehabilitation
counselor in this State.
Sec. 9. NRS 616C.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.595 1. If an injured employee is eligible for vocational
rehabilitation services pursuant to NRS 616C.590, the insurer and
the injured employee may, at any time during the employee’s
eligibility for such services, execute a written agreement providing
for the payment of compensation to the injured employee in a lump
sum in lieu of the provision of vocational rehabilitation services. An
insurer’s refusal to execute such an agreement may not be appealed.
2. If the insurer and the injured employee execute an agreement
pursuant to subsection 1, the acceptance of the payment of
compensation in a lump sum by the injured employee extinguishes
the right of the injured employee to receive vocational rehabilitation
services under the injured employee’s claim. Except as otherwise
required by federal law, an injured employee shall not receive
vocational rehabilitation services from any state agency after the
injured employee accepts payment of compensation in a lump sum
pursuant to this section.
3. Before executing an agreement pursuant to subsection 1, an
insurer shall:
(a) Order an assessment of and counseling concerning the
vocational skills of the injured employee, unless the provisions of
subsection 3 of NRS 616C.580 are applicable;
(b) Consult with the employer of the injured employee; and
(c) Provide a written notice to the injured employee that
contains the following statements:
(1) That the injured employee is urged to seek assistance and
advice from the Nevada Attorney for Injured Workers or to consult
with a private attorney before signing the agreement.
(2) That the injured employee may rescind the agreement
within 20 days after the injured employee signs it.
(3) That the 20-day period pursuant to subparagraph (2) may
not be waived.
(4) That acceptance by the injured employee of payment of
compensation in a lump sum in lieu of the provision of vocational
rehabilitation services extinguishes the right of the injured employee
to receive such services.
-
*SB363*

– 13 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.580, any
payment of compensation in a lump sum in lieu of the provision of
vocational rehabilitation services must not be less than 55 percent of
the maximum amount of vocational rehabilitation maintenance due
to the injured employee pursuant to NRS 616C.555.
5. No payment of compensation in a lump sum may be made
pursuant to this section until the 20-day period provided for the
rescission of the agreement has expired.
6. A private attorney or representative of the injured
employee may not receive a fee for any services in an amount
greater than 20 percent of any lump sum payment paid to the
injured employee pursuant to this section.
Sec. 10. NRS 41.745 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
41.745 Liability of employer for intentional conduct of
employee; limitations.
1. An employer is not liable for harm or injury caused by the
intentional conduct of an employee if the conduct of the employee:
(a) Was a truly independent venture of the employee;
(b) Was not committed in the course of the very task assigned to
the employee; and
(c) Was not reasonably foreseeable under the facts and
circumstances of the case considering the nature and scope of his or
her employment.
 For the purposes of this subsection, conduct of an employee is
reasonably foreseeable if a person of ordinary intelligence and
prudence could have reasonably anticipated the conduct and the
probability of injury.
2. Nothing in this section imposes strict liability on an
employer for any unforeseeable intentional act of an employee.
3. For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Employee” means any person who is employed by an
employer, including, without limitation, any present or former
officer or employee, immune contractor, an employee of a
university school for profoundly gifted pupils described in chapter
388C of NRS or a member of a board or commission or Legislator
in this State.
(b) “Employer” means any public or private employer in this
State, including, without limitation, the State of Nevada, a university
school for profoundly gifted pupils described in chapter 388C of
-
*SB363*

– 14 –
NRS, any agency of this State and any political subdivision of the
State.
(c) “Immune contractor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
subsection 3 of NRS 41.0307.
(d) “Officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in subsection 4 of
NRS 41.0307.
H
-
*SB363*